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BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM
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DTC C1243 /43,C 1245 /45 Malfunction inDecelerationSensor

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1243 / 43

While vehicle speed becomes 0 km/h (0 mph) from 30 km/h
(18 mph), and the condition that GL1 and GL2 signals of ECU
terminals did not change 40 mV or less continued in a
sequence 16 times.

Deceleration sensor

C1245 /45

At thevehiclespeedof30km/h (18mph)ormore,and the
condition that the difference between acceleration and decel-
erationvaluesofcomputation fromdecelerationsensorand
vehicle speed becomes more than 0.35 G continues for 60
sec. or more.

SDecelerationsensor
SWireharness fordecelerationsensorsystem

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Start the inspection from step 1 in case of using the hand−held tester and start from step 3 in case of not
using the hand−held tester.

1 Check output value of the yaw rate (deceleration) sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch to ON and turn the hand−held tester main switch to ON.
(c) Select the DATALIST mode on the hand−held tester.
CHECK:
Check that the deceleration value of the deceleration sensor observed in the hand−held tester changes
when the vehicle is tilted.
OK:

Deceleration value must be changing.

OK Go to step 3.

NG

2 Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between yaw rate (de-
celeration) sensor and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Replace yaw rate sensor.
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3 Check yaw rate (deceleration) sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect 3 dry batteries of 1.5 V in series.
(b)ConnectVYSterminal to thebatteries’positive (+) termi-

nal,andGYAWterminal to thebatteries’negative ( −) ter-
minal. Apply about 4.5 V between VYS and GYAW termi-
nals.

NOTICE:
Do not apply voltage of 6 V or more to terminals VYS and
GYAW.
CHECK:
Check the output voltage of GL1 and GL2 terminals when the
sensor is tilted forward and rearward.
OK:

Symbols Condition Standard Value

GL1 Horizontal About 2.3 V

GL1 Leanrearward 1.0V − about2.3V

GL1 Lean forward About2.3V − 3.5V

GL2 Horizontal About 2.3 V

GL2 Leanrearward About2.3V − 3.5V

GL2 Lean forward 1.0V − about2.3V

HINT:
S If thesensor is tilted toomuch itmayshowthewrongval-

ue.
S If dropped, thesensorshouldbe replacedwithanewone.
S The sensor removed from the vehicle should not be

placed upside down.

NG Replace yaw rate sensor.

OK
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4 Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between yaw rate (de-
celeration) sensor and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace skid control ECU.


